Utah statutes.
41-1a-303.   Cooperation for electronic credentialing.
The commission shall cooperate with the Department of Transportation and
federal agencies to assist in providing electronic credentialing of motor
carriers to facilitate implementation, compliance, and enforcement of vehicle
registration, special fuel tax payment, and other registration or taxation
provisions including the provisions of the International Registration Plan and
the International Fuel Tax Agreement.
